Utah statutes.
38-11-107.   Restrictions upon maintaining a lien against residence or
owner's interest in the residence.
(1)  A person qualified to file a lien upon an owner-occupied residence and
the real property associated with that residence under the provisions of Title
38, Chapter 1, Mechanics' Liens, who provides qualified services under an
agreement effective on or after January 1, 1995, other than directly with the
owner, shall be barred after January 1, 1995, from maintaining a lien upon
that residence and real property or recovering a judgment in any civil action
against the owner or the owner-occupied residence to recover monies owed for
qualified services provided by that person if:
(a)  an owner meets the conditions described in Subsections 38-11-204(4)(a)
and (4)(b); or
(b) (i)  a subsequent owner purchases a residence from an owner;
(ii)  the subsequent owner who purchased the residence under Subsection
(1)(b)(i) occupies the residence as a primary or secondary residence within
180 days from the date of transfer or the residence is occupied by the
subsequent owner's tenant or lessee as a primary or secondary residence within
180 days from the date of transfer; and
(iii)  the owner from whom the subsequent owner purchased the residence met
the conditions described in Subsections 38-11-204(4)(a) and (4)(b).
(2)  If a residence is constructed under conditions that do not meet all of
the provisions of Subsection (1), that residence and the real property
associated with that residence as provided in Section 38-1-4 shall be subject
to any mechanics' lien as provided in Section 38-1-3.
(3)  A lien claimant who files a mechanics' lien or foreclosure action upon an
owner-occupied residence is not liable for costs and attorneys' fees under
Sections 38-1-17 and 38-1-18 or for any damages arising from a civil action
related to the lien filing or foreclosure action if  the lien claimant removes
the lien within 15 days from the date the owner obtains a certificate of
compliance and mails a copy of the certificate of compliance by certified mail
to the lien claimant at the address provided for by Subsection
38-1-7(2)(a)(v).  The 15-day period begins accruing from the date postmarked
on the certificate of compliance sent to the lien claimant.
